cs: Velikostní kategorie dopadové žíněnky: Extra velký (Highball); Velký; Pro start v sedě; Standardní; Ostatní
th: ระดับขนาดของเบาะรองกันตก: ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษ (Highball); ใหญ่; Sit-start; มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
ru: Категория размера страховочного мата: Очень большой (Highball); Большой; Для старта сидя; Стандартный; Другое
de: Größenklasse des Crashpads: Extra groß (Highball); Groß; Sitzstart; Standard; Andere
es: Clase de tamaño de la colchoneta de caída: Extragrande (Highball); Grande; Inicio sentado; Estándar; Otro
hu: Bouldermatrac méretosztálya: Extra nagy (highball); Nagy; Ülésből induló; Standard; Egyéb
pt-BR: Classe de tamanho do colchão de proteção: Extragrande (Highball); Grande; Sit-start (início sentado); Padrão; Outros
fi: Kiipeilymaton kokoluokka: Erittäin suuri (Highball); Suuri; Istumalähtö; Vakio; Muu
sv: Kraschskydd storlekklass: Extra stor (Highball); Stor; Sittstart; Standard; Övrigt
it: Crash pad taglia class: Extra large (Highball); Grande; Partenza da seduti (Sit-start); Standard; Altro
nl: Crashpad maatklasse: Extra groot (Highball); Groot; Zittende start; Standaard; Overige
ja: クラッシュパッドのサイズクラス: 特大 (ハイボール); 大; シットスタート; 標準; その他
zh-TW: 抱石墊尺寸等級: 特大 (高抱石); 大; 坐起; 標準; 其他
el: Κατηγορία μεγέθους μαξιλαριού πρόσκρουσης: Πολύ μεγάλο (Highball); Μεγάλο; Sit-start; Κανονικό; Άλλο
ko: 크래시 패드 크기 등급: 특대형(하이볼); 대형; 싯스타트(Sit-start); 표준형; 기타
sl-SI: Razred velikosti plezalne blazine: Zelo veliko (Highball); Veliko; Za sedeči start; Standardno; Drugo
hr-HR: Klasa veličine podmetača za sudare: Iznimno veliko (Highball); Veliko; Sit-start; Standardno; Ostalo
pl: Klasa rozmiaru materaca asekuracyjnego: Bardzo duży (Highball); Duży; Sit-start; Standardowy; Inny
zh-CN: 攀岩保护垫尺寸等级: 超大（Highball）; 大; 坐姿起步垫; 标准; 其他
bg-BG: Клас размер на предпазен катерачен дюшек: Много големи (Highball); Големи; За старт от седеж; Стандартни; Други
fr: Catégorie de taille du crash pad: Très grand (Highball); Grand; Départ assis; Standard; Autre
vi: Phân loại kích thước miếng đệm chống va chạm: Cỡ đại (bóng nảy); Lớn; Ngồi nghỉ; Tiêu chuẩn; Khác
lt-LT: Kritimo kilimėlio dydžio klasė: Ypač didelis („Highball“); Didelis; Sėdimam startui; Standartinis; Kita
sk-SK: Trieda veľkosti tlmiacej podložky: Extra veľké (Highball); Veľké; Pre štart zo sedu (Sit-start); Štandardné; Iné
ro-RO: Clasa dimensională a saltelei de protecție la căzături: Extra-mare (Highball); Mare; Sit-start; Standard; Altele
en: Crash pad size class: Extra large (Highball); Large; Sit-start; Standard; Other
da: Klatreunderlagets størrelsesklasse: Ekstra stor (Highball); Stor; Sit-start; Standard; Andet
nb: Størrelsesklasse for krasjputer: Ekstra stor (highball); Stor; Sittestart; Standard; Annet
pt-PT: Classe de tamanho de colchão de impacto: Extragrande (Highball); Grande; Início sentado; Padrão; Outro
tr: Düşüş minderi boyut sınıfı: Ekstra büyük (Highball); Büyük; Oturarak başlama; Standart; Diğer